apertium-is-sv.sv.dix
<pardef n="l/ida__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ida</l>       <r>ida<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ider</l>      <r>ida<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ids</l>       <r>ida<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ida<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idit</l>      <r>ida<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>ida<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idande</l>    <r>ida<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="t/iga__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>iga</l>       <r>iga<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iger</l>      <r>iga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igs</l>       <r>iga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eg</l>        <r>iga<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igit</l>      <r>iga<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>iga<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igande</l>    <r>iga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/äga__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>äga</l>       <r>äga<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äger</l>      <r>äga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ägs</l>       <r>äga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>äga<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agat</l>      <r>äga<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äg</l>        <r>äga<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ägande</l>    <r>äga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>äga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>       <r>äga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agda</l>      <r>äga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="l/igga__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>igga</l>      <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igger</l>     <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iggs</l>      <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åg</l>        <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>egat</l>      <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igg</l>       <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iggande</l>   <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>       <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agda</l>      <r>igga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="när/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hör/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/imma__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>imma</l>      <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immar</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immas</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immade</l>    <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>am</l>        <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immat</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ummit</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imma</l>      <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immande</l>   <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immad</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immat</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>immade</l>    <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ummen</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ummet</l>     <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>umna</l>      <r>imma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="spr/inga__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>inga</l>      <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inger</l>     <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ings</l>      <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>inges</l>     <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>       <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungit</l>     <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingande</l>   <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungen</l>     <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unget</l>     <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungna</l>     <r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="snedvrida"><i>snedvr</i><par n="l/ida__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="motsäga"><i>mots</i><par n="s/äga__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="strida"><i>str</i><par n="l/ida__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillföra"><i>tillför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sprida"><i>spr</i><par n="l/ida__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="återinföra"><i>återinför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förstöra"><i>förstör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="framföra"><i>framför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utföra"><i>utför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="föra"><i>för</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="höra"><i>hör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="upphöra"><i>upphör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="införa"><i>inför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="köra"><i>köra</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ligga"><i>l</i><par n="l/igga__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slutföra"><i>slutför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fortskrida"><i>fortskr</i><par n="l/ida__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hänföra"><i>hänför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stiga"><i>st</i><par n="t/iga__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sammanföra"><i>sammanför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="säga"><i>s</i><par n="s/äga__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beröra"><i>berör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="röra"><i>rör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="styra"><i>styr</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillhöra"><i>tillhör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="störa"><i>stör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="medföra"><i>medför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="föreligga"><i>förel</i><par n="l/igga__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="överskrida"><i>överskr</i><par n="l/ida__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="överföra"><i>överför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="begära"><i>begär</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="härröra"><i>härrör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="genomföra"><i>genomför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lida"><i>l</i><par n="l/ida__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lida">            <i>l</i><par n="l/ida__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ligga">           <i>l</i><par n="l/igga__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="säga">            <i>s</i><par n="s/äga__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rida">            <i>r</i><par n="l/ida__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="simma">           <i>s</i><par n="s/imma__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="springa">         <i>spr</i><par n="spr/inga__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="strida">          <i>str</i><par n="l/ida__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tiga">            <i>t</i><par n="t/iga__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nära">            <i>när</i><par n="när/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="höra">            <i>hör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förhöra">         <i>förhör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="genomföra">       <i>genomför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="föra">            <i>för</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="röra">            <i>rör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utföra">          <i>utför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="medföra">         <i>medför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="framföra">        <i>framför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uppföra">         <i>uppför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillföra">        <i>tillför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slutföra">        <i>slutför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bokföra">         <i>bokför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="återinföra">      <i>återinför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="saluföra">        <i>saluför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="överföra">        <i>överför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="testköra">        <i>testkör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="folkbokföra">     <i>folkbokför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avföra">          <i>avför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förstöra">        <i>förstör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="införa">          <i>inför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="korsförhöra">     <i>korsförhör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillhöra">        <i>tillhör</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hårdföra"><i>hårdför</i><par n="hör/a__vblex"/></e>
